Utah statutes.
77-10a-19.   Compensation for special prosecutors.

(1)  Compensation for special prosecutors under this section shall be paid by the Judicial Council.  For this purpose, there is appropriated from the General Fund to the Judicial Council $50,000 as a separate line item in the budget of the Judicial Council for the fiscal year 1989-1990.  The line item shall be nonlapsing.

(2) (a)  If during the fiscal year compensation of special prosecutors under this chapter exceeds $50,000, additional compensation shall be requested as a supplemental appropriation from the Legislature.

(b)  If during the fiscal year compensation of special prosecutors under this chapter is less than $50,000, the balance carries over to the next fiscal year, and the appropriation for that next fiscal year for prosecutor compensation shall be no more than the amount necessary to total $50,000 when added to the nonlapsing balance carried over from the prior fiscal year.

